District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.141

District officials.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in § 2-1217.140(c), the elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents of the District shall not be liable personally for the payment of the bonds, be subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance of the bonds, or be personally liable for any representations, warranties, covenants, obligations, or agreements of the District contained in this subchapter, the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.

(b)

The signature, countersignature, facsimile signature, or facsimile countersignature of any official appearing on the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes notwithstanding the fact that the individual signatory ceases to hold that office before delivery of the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-252, § 111, 55 DCR 9251